Arkansas, session 2025, HB1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-16-718 is amended to read as follows:
25-16-718. Use of settlement and civil penalty funds.
(a) When a settlement is agreed to or a judgment is entered in a
lawsuit in which the state is a party receiving all or part of the funds from
the settlement or judgment, the The Attorney General shall create and
maintain accounts as necessary to receive the funds resulting from:
(1) A settlement that is agreed to or a judgment that is entered
in a lawsuit in which the state is a party receiving all or part of the funds
from the settlement or judgment; or
(2) A civil penalty collected by the Attorney General for which
the law does not specify a use.
(b) The Attorney General shall distribute the funds as:
(1)(A) Restitution to Arkansas consumers or state agencies or
for other purposes as designated by the court order or settlement agreement.
(B) Funds distributed under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section shall be distributed to Arkansas consumers as soon as practicable and
*LGL171*
03/18/2025 1:40:54 PM LGL171

HB1831
according to any applicable court order;
(2) Cash funds to a state agency having a nexus to the
underlying litigation;
(3) Payment of attorney's fees or civil penalties under § 4-88-
113(a)(1), § 4-88-113(c), or § 4-88-113(e);
(4) Required under § 4-88-105, if the funds are deposited into
the Consumer Education and Enforcement Account; or
(5) Payment for personal services, miscellaneous operating
expenses, or grants of the Attorney General's office.
(c)(1) The Attorney General's office shall provide a quarterly report
to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee of all cash funds
received from court orders or settlement agreements.
(2) The report shall include:
(A) The case name of the court order or settlement
agreement;
(B) The amount of funds received by the Attorney General's
office for each court order or settlement agreement; and
(C)(i) A plan for disbursement of the funds.
(ii) If cash funds received from a court order or
settlement agreement are expended for any purpose, the report shall itemize
specific activities subject to the exclusions provided in § 4-88-111 and §
25-1-403(1)(B).
(iii) The report shall also itemize the specific
consumer education and enforcement activities funded for the Attorney
General's office.
(3) If funds received from a court order or settlement agreement
are given to a specific entity by the Attorney General's office, the report
shall include:
(A)(i) A statement regarding whether the court order or
settlement agreement directed funds to be given to a specific entity.
(ii) If the court order or settlement agreement
directs funds be given to a specific entity, the Attorney General's office
shall provide a summary of input regarding the drafting of the court order or
settlement agreement.
(iii) If the Attorney General's office receives funds
from a court order or settlement agreement that does not require disbursement
03/18/2025 1:40:54 PM LGL171

HB1831
of funds to a specific entity, the Attorney General's office shall report a
rationale for disbursing funds to a specific entity; and
(B) A report of current balances of all unappropriated
cash fund holdings received by court order or settlement agreement by the
Attorney General's office.
(4) The quarterly reports shall be provided no later than the
fifteenth day of the month immediately following the end of each quarter.





























03/18/2025 1:40:54 PM LGL171